District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Historic African American Burial Grounds Preservation Fund
Amendment Act of 2025”.


TITLE I. PAUL E. SLUBY, SR. PRESERVATION FUND.
Sec. 101. Definitions.
For the purposes of this title, the term:
(1) "Historic African American burial ground" means a cemetery or any natural or
prepared physical location, whether originally below, on, or above the surface of the earth, into
which human remains are deposited as a part of the death rite or ceremony of a culture, and that
was established in the District of Columbia prior to January 1, 1955, for interments of African
Americans and is owned by a public body or qualified charitable organization.
(2) "Qualified charitable organization" means a charitable corporation, charitable
association, or charitable trust that has been granted tax-exempt status under § 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code and whose primary purpose is the preservation of historical cemeteries
and graves or was formed for the purpose of identifying, preserving, or maintaining Historic
African American burial grounds.
Sec. 102. Establishment of the Paul E. Sluby, Sr., Preservation Fund.
(a) There is established as a special fund, the Paul E. Sluby, Sr. Preservation Fund
(“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
Development in accordance with subsections (c) and (d) of this section, to identify, preserve,
restore, protect, maintain, repatriate, or commemorate graves, monuments, or markers at Historic
African American burial grounds.
(b) Revenue from the following sources shall be deposited into the Fund:
(1) Appropriated funds;
(2) Gifts;


(3) Grants; and
(4) Donations.
(c) Money in the Fund shall be used to provide grants to qualified charitable
organizations for the following purposes:
(1) The preservation and restoration of historic African American burial grounds;
(2) The identification of historic African American burial grounds;
(3) The interpretation of historic African American burial grounds;
(4) The repatriation of African American human remains, particularly those from
former historic African American burial grounds; or
(5) Related research and documentation of historic African American burial
grounds including burial records, locational data, and contested ownership.
(d) The money deposited into the Fund but not expended in a fiscal year shall not revert
to the unassigned fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a
fiscal year, or at any other time.
(e) The money in the Fund shall not be used for any purpose other than the purposes
specified in subsection (c).
(f) Qualified charitable organizations that seek a grant for activities at a historic African
American burial ground that is located on entirely private property shall only be considered for a
grant with the consent of the property owner.
Sec. 103. Rules.


The Mayor pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act,
approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), may issue rules
to implement the provisions of this act.
TITLE II. CONFORMING AMENDMENT.
Sec. 201. Section 2032(p) of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04(a)), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(b) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase ";
and” in its place.
(c) A new paragraph (8) is added to read as follows:
“(8) Funds in support of Historic African American Burial Grounds pursuant to
the Historic African American Burial Grounds Preservation Fund Amendment Act of 2025, as
introduced on January 6, 2025 (Bill 26-___).”.
100 TITLE III. GENERAL PROVISIONS.
101 Sec. 301. Applicability.
102 (a) This act shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
103 budget and financial plan.
104 (b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal
105 effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of
106 the Council of the certification.


107 (c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published
108 in the District of Columbia Register.
109 (2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
110 applicability of this act.
111 Sec. 302. Fiscal impact statement.
112 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
113 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
114 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
115 Sec. 303. Effective date.
116 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
117 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of Congressional review as
118 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
119 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
120 Register.